Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 9 PESTICIDE ACT
35-9-121. Enforcement.

The commissioner or his designee shall enforce the provisions of this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, he may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require any person to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions be ceased forthwith.

At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request, at his discretion, an immediate hearing or a hearing not more than ten days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after such request to determine whether a violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The registrant shall pay a penalty fee of one hundred dollars, in addition to any other assessed penalty, if the commissioner determines that the registrant has violated this article or any rule promulgated under this article after a hearing is held pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b).

In the event that any person fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order within twenty-four hours, the commissioner may bring a suit for a temporary restraining order and injunctive relief to prevent any further or continued violation of such order.

No stay of a cease-and-desist order shall be issued before a hearing thereon involving both parties.

Matters brought before a court pursuant to this section shall have preference over other matters on the court's calendar.

Whenever the commissioner possesses evidence satisfactory to him that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule adopted under this article, he may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule adopted under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1571, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2005:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1268, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-9-107 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-9-122. Denial - suspension - revocation.

The commissioner, pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., may issue letters of admonition, or deny, refuse to renew, suspend, or revoke any pesticide or device registration or any pesticide dealer license if the applicant, holder of the registration, or licensee:

Has refused or failed to comply with any provision of this article, any rule adopted under this article, or any lawful order of the commissioner;

Has been convicted of a felony for an offense related to conduct regulated by this article;

Has used fraud or deception in the procurement or attempted procurement of any registration or license authorized under this article, or the renewal thereof;

Has failed to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner;

Has had an equivalent registration or license canceled, denied, revoked, or suspended by any authority;

Has been adjudicated a violator or has committed a violation of the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act", as amended; except that a consent decree entered into with the environmental protection agency shall not be considered a violation of such act unless an order from the regional administrator of the environmental protection agency or the consent decree shall specifically state that a violation has occurred;

Has refused to provide the commissioner with reasonable, complete, and accurate information regarding methods or materials used or work performed when requested by the commissioner; or

Has falsified any information requested by the commissioner.

In any proceeding held under this section, the commissioner may accept as prima facie evidence of grounds for disciplinary action any disciplinary action taken against a licensee or holder of a registration from another jurisdiction if the violation which prompted the disciplinary action in that jurisdiction would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section.

No licensee whose license has been revoked may apply or reapply for a license under this article until two years from the date of such revocation.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1571, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-9-109 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act", see Pub.L. 92-516, codified at 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.

35-9-123. Embargo.

This section shall apply whenever the commissioner finds or has reasonable cause to believe that any pesticide or device:

Is adulterated or misbranded;

Has not been registered under the provisions of this article;

Fails to bear on its label the information required by this article; or

Is in violation of any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article.

If any of the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section apply, the commissioner may affix to such pesticide or device a tag or other appropriate marking giving notice thereof and stating that the pesticide or device has been detained or embargoed and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such pesticide or device by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction.

Any person who removes or disposes of such detained or embargoed pesticide or device by sale or otherwise, without prior permission, or removes or alters the tag or marking commits a class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, such person may be subjected to appropriate administrative proceedings.

When a pesticide or device detained or embargoed under subsection (2) of this section has been found by the commissioner to be in violation of any provision of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article and if the violation has not been resolved in thirty days, the commissioner may petition a court of competent jurisdiction for a condemnation of such pesticide or device. When the commissioner has found that a pesticide or device so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, he shall remove the tag or other marking.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed pesticide or device is in violation of this article or rules adopted thereunder, such pesticide or device shall after entry of the decree be destroyed at the expense of the owner, claimant, or custodian thereof, under the supervision of the commissioner, and all court costs and attorney fees and storage and other proper expenses shall be assessed against the owner, claimant, or custodian of such pesticide or device or his agent. However, if the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the pesticide or device, the court, after entry of the decree and after such costs, attorney fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond has been executed, conditioned upon the proper labeling or processing of such pesticide or device, may by order direct that such pesticide or device be delivered to the owner, claimant, or custodian thereof for such labeling or processing under the supervision of the commissioner. The expense of such supervision shall be paid by the owner, claimant, or custodian. The pesticide or device shall be returned to the owner, claimant, or custodian of the pesticide or device on the representation to the court by the commissioner that the pesticide or device is no longer in violation of this article and that the expenses of such supervision have been paid.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1572, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1547, § 304, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3277, § 617, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-9-110 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-9-124. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any regulation made pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Each day the violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1573, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-9-109 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-9-125. Criminal penalties.

No person may be charged under this section unless it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., that such person has twice committed the violation to be charged; except that this subsection (1) shall not apply to any person who violates any of the provisions of section 35-9-120 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(e), (1)(f), (1)(j), (1)(k), or (2)(c).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of section 35-9-120 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(f), (1)(h), (1)(j), (1)(k), (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), or (2)(g) or 35-9-123 (3) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person who violates section 35-9-120 (1)(g), (2)(d), (2)(e), or (2)(f) commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1573, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2002:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1547, § 305, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3277, § 618, effective March 1, 2022; (4)(b) added by revision, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, pp. 3277, 3331, §§ 618, 803.

35-9-126. Pesticide fund - transfer of moneys to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund - fees.

All fees and civil fines collected pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3. Within sixty days after July 1, 2009, the unexpended and unencumbered balance of the pesticide fund, as that fund existed prior to July 1, 2009, shall be transferred to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 316, § 5, effective July 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1574, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1267, § 20, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 316, § 5, effective July 1.

35-9-127. Advisory committee.

An advisory committee, as established pursuant to article 10 of this title, shall assist the commissioner as set forth therein and in developing rules and regulations to carry out the provision of this article.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1574, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-9-106 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-9-128. Information.

The commissioner, in cooperation with other agencies of this state or the federal government, may publish information pertaining to pesticides and conduct workshops for the purpose of informing pesticide dealers of new developments in the field of pesticides.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1574, § 1, effective June 7.